Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1097
Eminent domain; location upon state school land; authority of district to purchase.

When a school district desires to locate a schoolhouse on school lands belonging to the state, it may purchase not less than one acre and not more than ten acres per school site and shall receive a deed for such land from the state.

Laws 1921, c. 51, § 11, p. 225;

C.S.1922, § 6496;

C.S.1929, § 79-1711;

R.S.1943, § 79-1711;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 155, p. 745;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,117;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 743.